Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-403
Real property; purchase, lease-purchase, or acquisition; appraisal required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no political subdivision shall purchase, lease-purchase, or acquire for consideration real property having an estimated value of one hundred thousand dollars or more unless an appraisal of such property has been performed by a certified real property appraiser.

Laws 1994, LB 681, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 3.